Utah statutes.
64-13-25.   Standards for programs -- Audits.

(1)  To promote accountability and to ensure safe and professional operation of correctional programs, the department shall establish minimum standards for the organization and operation of its programs.

(a)  The standards shall be promulgated according to state rulemaking provisions.  Those standards that apply to offenders are exempt from the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 3, the Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.  Offenders are not a class of persons under that act.

(b)  Standards shall provide for inquiring into and processing offender complaints.

(2)  There shall be an audit for compliance with standards according to policies and procedures established by the department, for continued operation of correctional programs.

(a)  At least every three years, the department shall internally audit all programs for compliance with established standards.

(b)  All financial statements and accounts of the department shall be reviewed during the audit.  Written review shall be provided to the managers of the programs and the executive director of the department.

(c)  The reports shall be classified as confidential internal working papers and access is available at the discretion of the executive director or the governor, or upon court order.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

